California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
 (commencing with Section 22350) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code or of licensure as a private investigator pursuant to Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) This section shall only apply to a gated community or a covered multifamily dwelling that is staffed at the time service of process is attempted by a guard or other security personnel assigned to control access to the community or dwelling.

(c) For purposes of this section, “covered multifamily dwelling” means either of the following:

(1) An apartment building, including a timeshare apartment building not considered a place of public accommodation or transient lodging, with three or more dwelling units.

(2) A
 condominium, including a timeshare condominium not considered a place of public accommodation or transient lodging, with four or more dwelling units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   (AB 622)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

415.30.

(a) A summons may be served by mail as provided in this section. A copy of the summons and of the complaint shall be mailed (by first-class mail or airmail, postage prepaid) to the person to be served, together with two copies of the notice and acknowledgment provided for in subdivision (b) and a return envelope, postage prepaid, addressed to the sender.

(b) The notice specified in subdivision (a) shall be in substantially the following form:

(Title of court and cause, with action number, to
be inserted by the sender prior to mailing)
NOTICE

To:(Here state the name of the person to be served.)

This summons is served pursuant to Section 415.30 of the California Code of Civil Procedure. Failure to complete this form and return it to the sender within 20 days may subject you (or the party on whose behalf you are being served) to liability for the payment of any expenses incurred in serving a summons upon you in any other manner permitted by law. If you are served on behalf of a corporation, unincorporated association (including a partnership), or other entity, this form must be signed in the name of such entity by you or by a person authorized to receive service of process on behalf of such entity. In all other cases, this form must be signed by you personally or by a person authorized by you to acknowledge receipt of summons. Section 415.30 provides that
this summons is deemed served on the date of execution of an acknowledgment of receipt of summons. Signature of senderACKNOWLEDGMENT OF RECEIPT OF SUMMONS

This acknowledges receipt on (insert date) of a copy of the summons and of the complaint at (insert address).Date:(Date this
acknowledgement is executed)Signature of person acknowledging receipt, with title if
acknowledgment is made on behalf of another person(c) Service of a summons pursuant to this section is deemed complete on the date a written acknowledgement of receipt of summons is executed, if such acknowledgement thereafter is returned to the sender.

(d) If the person to whom a copy of the summons and of the complaint are mailed pursuant to this section fails to complete and return the acknowledgement form set forth in subdivision (b) within 20 days from the date of such mailing, the party to whom the summons was mailed shall be liable for reasonable expenses thereafter incurred in serving or attempting to serve the party by another method permitted by this chapter, and, except for good cause shown, the court in which the action is pending, upon motion, with or without notice, shall award the party such expenses whether or not he is otherwise entitled to recover his costs in the action.

(e) A notice or acknowledgment of receipt in form approved by the Judicial Council is deemed to comply with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1610.)
-------------------------------------------

415.40.

A summons may be served on a person outside this state in any manner provided by this article or by sending a copy of the summons and of the complaint to the person to be served by first-class mail, postage prepaid, requiring a return receipt. Service of a summons by this form of mail is deemed complete on the 10th day after such mailing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 249, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

415.45.

(a) A summons in an action for unlawful detainer of real property may be served by posting if upon affidavit it appears to the satisfaction of the court in which the action is pending that the party to be served cannot with reasonable diligence be served in any manner specified in this article other than publication and that:

(1) A cause of action exists against the party upon whom service is to be made or they are a necessary or proper party to the action; or

(2) The party to be served has or claims an interest in real property in this state that is subject to the jurisdiction of the court or the relief demanded in the action consists wholly or in part in excluding such party from any interest in
 such property.

(b) The court shall order the summons to be posted on the premises in a manner most likely to give actual notice to the party to be served and direct that a copy of the summons and of the complaint be forthwith mailed by certified mail to such party at the party’s last known address.

(c) Service of summons in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after posting and mailing.

(d) Notwithstanding an order for posting of the summons, a summons may be served in any other manner authorized by this article, except publication, in which event such service shall supersede any posted summons.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 6.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 7 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

415.45.

(a) A summons in an action for unlawful detainer of real property may be served by posting if upon affidavit it appears to the satisfaction of the court in which the action is pending that the party to be served cannot with reasonable diligence be served in any manner specified in this article other than publication and if either of the following conditions exists:

(1) A cause of action exists against the party upon whom service is to be made or they are a necessary or proper party to the action.

(2) The party to be served has or claims an interest in real property in this state that is subject to the jurisdiction of the court or the relief demanded in the action consists wholly or
 in part in excluding such party from any interest in such property.

(b) The court shall order the summons to be posted on the premises in a manner most likely to give actual notice to the party to be served and direct that a copy of the summons and of the complaint be forthwith mailed by certified mail to such party at the party’s last known address.

(c) Service of summons in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after posting and mailing.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, a party shows reasonable diligence by attempting personal delivery of the summons and complaint, in good faith, on at least three occasions on three different days at three different times.

(2) Except with respect to actions for unlawful detainer of
 “commercial real property,” as defined under subdivision (d) of Section 1161.1 or “program participants,” as defined under paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 6205.5 of the Government Code, at least one of the attempts shall be made at the dwelling place or usual place of abode of the person to be served, provided that the dwelling place or usual place of abode is known or could be determined with reasonable effort.

(e) Notwithstanding an order for posting of the summons, a summons may be served in any other manner authorized by this article, except publication, in which event such service shall supersede any posted summons.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 7.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

415.46.

(a) In addition to the service of a summons and complaint in an action for unlawful detainer upon a tenant and subtenant, if any, as prescribed by this article, a prejudgment claim of right to possession may also be served on any person who appears to be or who may claim to have occupied the premises at the time of the filing of the action. Service upon occupants shall be made
pursuant to subdivision (c) by serving a copy of a prejudgment claim of right to possession, as specified in subdivision (f), attached to a copy of the summons and complaint at the same time service is made upon the tenant and subtenant, if any.

(b) Service of the prejudgment claim of right to possession in this manner shall be effected by a marshal, sheriff, or registered process server.

(c) (1) When serving the summons and complaint upon a tenant and subtenant, if any, the marshal, sheriff, or registered process server shall make a reasonably diligent effort to ascertain whether there are other adult occupants of the premises who are not named in the summons and complaint by inquiring of the person or persons who are being personally served, or any person of suitable age and discretion who appears to reside upon the premises, whether there are other
occupants of the premises.

(2) If the identity of such an occupant is disclosed to the officer or process server and the occupant is present at the premises, the officer or process server shall serve that occupant with a copy of the prejudgment claim of right to possession attached to a copy of the summons and complaint. If personal service cannot be made upon that occupant at that time, service may be effected by leaving a copy of a prejudgment claim of right to possession attached to a copy of the summons and complaint addressed to that occupant with a person of suitable age and discretion at the premises, affixing the same so that it is not readily removable in a conspicuous place on the premises in a manner most likely to give actual notice to that occupant, and sending the same addressed to that occupant by first-class mail.

(3) In addition to the service on an identified
occupant, or if no occupant is disclosed to the officer or process server, or if substituted service is made upon the tenant and subtenant, if any, the officer or process server shall serve a prejudgment claim of right to possession for all other persons who may claim to occupy the premises at the time of the filing of the action by leaving a copy of a prejudgment claim of right to possession attached to a copy of the summons and complaint at the premises at the same time service is made upon the tenant and subtenant, if any, affixing the same so that it is not readily removable in a conspicuous place on the premises so that it is likely to give actual notice to an occupant, and sending the same addressed to “all occupants in care of the named tenant” to the premises by first-class mail.

(4) The person serving process shall state the date of service on the prejudgment claim of right to possession form. However, the absence of the date of
service on the prejudgment claim of right to possession does not invalidate the claim.

(d) Proof of service under this section shall be filed with the court and shall include a statement that service was made pursuant to this section. Service on occupants in accordance with this section shall not alter or affect service upon the tenant or subtenant, if any.

(e) (1) If an owner or his or her agent has directed and obtained service of a prejudgment claim of right to possession in accordance with this section, no occupant of the premises, whether or not that occupant is named in the judgment for possession, may object to the enforcement of that judgment as prescribed in Section 1174.3.

(2) In any action for unlawful detainer resulting from a foreclosure sale of a rental housing unit pursuant to
Section 1161a, paragraph (1) shall not limit the right of any tenant or subtenant of the property to file a prejudgment claim of right of possession pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1174.25 at any time before judgment, or to object to enforcement of a judgment for possession as prescribed in Section 1174.3, regardless of whether the tenant or subtenant was served with a prejudgment claim of right to possession.

(f) The prejudgment claim of right to possession shall be made on the following form:

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The Prejudgment Claim of 
 Right to Possession form appears in the published chaptered 
 bill. See Sec. 7, Chapter 913 (pp. 73–76), Statutes of 2014. 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *
* * * * * * * * * *

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 7.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text. The Prejudgment Claim of Right to Possession form appears on pages 73 to 76 of Ch. 913.)
-------------------------------------------

415.47.

(a) Where the lessee has given the lessor written notice of the lessee’s intent not to abandon leased real property as provided in Section 1951.3 of the Civil Code, the summons in an action for unlawful detainer of the real property may be served on the lessee by certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the lessee at the address stated in the lessee’s notice of intent not to abandon if such summons is deposited in the mail within 60 days from the date the lessee’s notice of intent not to abandon is received by the lessor. Service in this manner is deemed completed on the 10th day after such
mailing.

(b) Where the lessee has given the lessor written notice of the lessee’s intent not to abandon leased real property as provided in Section 1951.3 of the Civil Code, but failed to include in such notice an address at which the lessee may be served by certified mail in any action for unlawful detainer of the real property, the summons in an action for unlawful detainer of the real property may be served on the lessee by certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the lessee at (1) the same address or addresses to which the lessor’s notice of belief of abandonment was addressed if that notice was given by mail or (2) the address of the real property if the lessor’s notice of belief of abandonment was personally served on the lessee. Service may not be made pursuant to this subdivision unless the summons is deposited in the mail within 60 days from the date the lessee’s notice of intent not to
abandon is received by the lessor. Service in the manner authorized by this subdivision is deemed completed on the 10th day after such mailing.

(c) This section provides an alternative method of service on the lessee and does not preclude service in any other manner authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 332.)
-------------------------------------------

415.50.

(a) A summons may be served by publication if upon affidavit it appears to the satisfaction of the court in which the action is pending that the party to be served cannot with reasonable diligence be served in another manner specified in this article and that either:

(1) A cause of action exists against the party upon whom service is to be made or he or she is a necessary or proper party to the action.

(2) The party to be served has or claims an interest in real or personal property in this state that is subject to the jurisdiction of the court or the relief demanded in the action consists wholly or in part in excluding the party from any interest in the property.

(b) The court shall order the summons to be published in a named newspaper, published in this state, that is most likely to give actual notice to the party to be served. If the party to be served resides or is located out of this state, the court may also order the summons to be published in a named newspaper outside this state that is most likely to give actual notice to that party. The order shall direct that a copy of the summons, the complaint, and the order for publication be forthwith mailed to the party if his or her address is ascertained before expiration of the time prescribed for publication of the summons. Except as otherwise provided by statute, the
publication shall be made as provided by Section 6064 of the Government Code unless the court, in its discretion, orders publication for a longer period.

(c) Service of a summons in this manner is deemed complete as provided in Section 6064 of the Government Code.

(d) Notwithstanding an order for publication of the summons, a summons may be served in another manner authorized by this chapter, in which event the service shall supersede any published summons.

(e) As a condition of establishing that the party to be served cannot with reasonable diligence be served in another manner specified in this article, the court may not require that a search be conducted of public databases where access by a registered process server to residential addresses is prohibited by law or by published policy of the agency providing the
database, including, but not limited to, voter registration rolls and records of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

415.95.

(a) A summons may be served on a business organization, form unknown, by leaving a copy of the summons and complaint during usual office hours with the person who is apparently in charge of the office of that business organization, and by thereafter mailing a copy of the summons and complaint by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the person to be served at the place where a copy of the summons and complaint was left. Service of a summons in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after the mailing.

(b) Service of a summons pursuant to this section is not valid for a corporation with a registered agent for service of process listed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 128, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Persons Upon Whom Summons May Be Served [416.10. - 416.90.]

416.10.

A summons may be served on a corporation by delivering a copy of the summons and the complaint by any of the following methods:

(a) To the person designated as agent for service of process as provided by any provision in Section 202, 1502, 2105, or 2107 of the Corporations Code (or Sections 3301 to 3303, inclusive, or Sections 6500 to 6504, inclusive, of the Corporations Code, as in effect on December 31, 1976, with respect to corporations to which they remain applicable).

(b) To the president, chief executive officer, or other head of the corporation, a vice president, a secretary or assistant secretary, a treasurer or assistant treasurer, a controller or chief financial officer, a general manager, or a person authorized by the corporation to receive service of process.

(c) If the corporation is a bank, to a cashier or assistant cashier or to a person specified in subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) If authorized by any provision in Section 1701, 1702, 2110, or 2111 of the Corporations Code (or Sections 3301 to 3303, inclusive, or Sections 6500 to 6504, inclusive, of the Corporations Code, as in effect on December 31, 1976, with respect to corporations to which they remain applicable), as provided by that provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 567, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

416.20.

A summons may be served on a corporation that has forfeited its charter or right to do business, or has dissolved, by delivering a copy of the summons and of the complaint:

(a) To a person who is a trustee of the corporation and of its stockholders or members; or

(b) When authorized by any provision in Sections 2011 or 2114 of the Corporations Code (or Sections 3301 to 3303, inclusive, or Sections 6500 to 6504, inclusive, of the Corporations Code as in effect on December 31, 1976, with respect to corporations to which they remain
applicable), as provided by such provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

416.30.

A summons may be served on a joint stock company or association by delivering a copy of the summons and of the complaint as provided by Section 416.10 or 416.20.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1610.)
-------------------------------------------

416.40.

A summons may be served on an unincorporated association (including a partnership) by delivering a copy of the summons and of the complaint:

(a) If the association is a general or limited partnership, to the person designated as agent for service of process in a statement filed with the Secretary of State or to a general partner or the general manager of the partnership;

(b) If the association is not a general or limited
partnership, to the person designated as agent for service of process in a statement filed with the Secretary of State or to the president or other head of the association, a vice president, a secretary or assistant secretary, a treasurer or assistant treasurer, a general manager, or a person authorized by the association to receive service of process;

(c) When authorized by Section 18220 of the Corporations Code, as provided by that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 178, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

416.50.

(a) A summons may be served on a public entity by delivering a copy of the summons and of the complaint to the clerk, secretary, president, presiding officer, or other head of its governing body.

(b) As used in this section, “public entity” includes the state and any office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of the state, the Regents of the University of California, a county, city, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1610.)
-------------------------------------------

416.60.

A summons may be served on a minor by delivering a copy of the summons and of the complaint to his parent, guardian, conservator, or similar fiduciary, or, if no such person can be found with reasonable diligence, to any person having the care or control of such minor or with whom he resides or by whom he is employed, and to the minor if he is at least 12 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

416.70.

A summons may be served on a person (other than a minor) for whom a guardian, conservator, or similar fiduciary has been appointed by delivering a copy of the summons and of the complaint to his guardian, conservator, or similar fiduciary and to such person, but, for good cause shown, the court in which the action is pending may dispense with delivery to such person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

416.80.

When authorized by Section 12 of the Elections Code, a summons may be served as provided by that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 38.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

416.90.

A summons may be served on a person not otherwise specified in this article by delivering a copy of the summons and of the complaint to such person or to a person authorized by him to receive service of process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1610.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Proof of Service [417.10. - 417.40.]

417.10.

Proof that a summons was served on a person within this state shall be made:

(a) If served under Section 415.10, 415.20, or 415.30, by the affidavit of the person making the service showing the time, place, and manner of service and facts showing that the service was made in accordance with this chapter. The affidavit shall recite or in other manner show the name of the person to whom a copy of the summons and of the complaint were delivered, and, if appropriate, the person’s title or the capacity in which the person is served, and that the notice required by Section 412.30 appeared on the copy of the summons served, if in fact it did appear.

If service is made by mail pursuant to Section 415.30, proof of service shall include the
 acknowledgment of receipt of summons in the form provided by that section or other written acknowledgment of receipt of summons satisfactory to the court.

(b) If served by publication pursuant to Section 415.50, by the affidavit of the publisher or printer, or the publisher’s or the printer’s foreperson or principal clerk, showing the time and place of publication, and an affidavit showing the time and place a copy of the summons and of the complaint were mailed to the party to be served, if in fact mailed.

(c) If served pursuant to another law of this state, in the manner prescribed by that law or, if no manner is prescribed, in the manner prescribed by this section for proof of a similar manner of service.

(d) By the written admission of the party.

(e) If served by posting pursuant to Section 415.45, by the affidavit of the person who posted the premises, showing the time and place of posting, and an affidavit showing the time and place copies of the summons and of the complaint were mailed to the party to be served, if in fact mailed.

(f) All proof of personal service shall be made on a form adopted by the Judicial Council.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 8.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 9 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

417.10.

Proof that a summons was served on a person within this state shall be made:

(a) If served under Section 415.10, 415.20, 415.30, or 415.45, by the affidavit of the person making the service showing the time, place, and manner of service and facts showing that the service was made in accordance with this chapter. The affidavit shall recite or in other manner show the name of any person to whom a copy of the summons and complaint were delivered, and, if appropriate, the person’s title or the capacity in which the person is served, and that the notice required by Section 412.30 appeared on the copy of the summons served, if in fact it did appear.

(1) If served under Section 415.10, 415.20, or 415.45, the
 proof of service shall include one or more photographs of the site of each effected or attempted service of the summons and complaint.

(A) Each photograph shall contain a readable stamp that establishes and automatically records the date, time, and global positioning system (GPS) or equivalent coordinates of the effected or attempted service.

(B) If no GPS, cellular, or equivalent signal is available at the time and place of an effected or attempted service, the process server shall provide a detailed statement on or with the proof of service explaining the reason for the lack of a readable GPS or equivalent stamp on the photograph.

(2) (A) If the site of the effected or attempted service is a dwelling place or abode, for each effected or attempted service of the summons and complaint, at least
 one of the photographs required by paragraph (1) shall show the door, or, if the door is not reasonably accessible, the entrance of the house, apartment, or other dwelling place of the person to be served.

(B) If the site of the effected or attempted service is a place of business, for each effected or attempted service of the summons and complaint, at least one of the photographs required by paragraph (1) shall show the door, or, if the door is not reasonably accessible, the entrance of the specific office or other place of business of the person being served.

(C) For purposes of subparagraphs (A) and (B), if the door is not reasonably accessible and the process server takes a photograph of the entrance instead, the process server shall explain with specificity on or with the proof of service why the door was not accessible.

(3) If service is made by mail pursuant to Section 415.30, proof of service shall include the acknowledgment of receipt of summons in the form provided by that section or other written acknowledgment of receipt of summons satisfactory to the court.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a photograph is not required if, in the reasonable judgment of the process server, taking a photograph would compromise the process server’s safety. In such circumstances, the process server shall document the effected or attempted service on the proof of service and provide a detailed statement explaining why taking a photograph would have compromised their safety.

(5) The photograph required by paragraph (1) shall be taken by the process server as closely as practicable to the time of effecting or attempting service.

(b) If
 served by publication pursuant to Section 415.50, by the affidavit of the publisher or printer, or the publisher’s or printer’s foreperson or principal clerk, showing the time and place of publication, and an affidavit showing the time and place a copy of the summons and of the complaint were mailed to the party to be served, if in fact mailed.

(c) If served pursuant to another law of this state, in the manner prescribed by that law or, if no manner is prescribed, in the manner prescribed by this section for proof of a similar manner of service.

(d) By the written admission of the party.

(e) If served by posting pursuant to Section 415.45, by the affidavit of the person who posted the premises, showing the time and place of posting, and an affidavit showing the time and place copies of the summons and of the
 complaint were mailed to the party to be served, if in fact mailed.

(f) All proof of personal service shall be made on a form adopted by the Judicial Council.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 8) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 9.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

417.20.

Proof that a summons was served on a person outside this state shall be made:

(a) If served in a manner specified in a statute of this state, as prescribed by Section 417.10, and if service is made by mail pursuant to Section 415.40, proof of service shall include evidence satisfactory to the court establishing actual delivery to the person to be served, by a signed return receipt or other evidence;

(b) In the manner prescribed by the court order pursuant to which the service is made;

(c) Subject to any additional requirements that may be imposed by the court in which the action is pending, in the manner prescribed by the law of the place where the person is served for proof of service in an action in its courts of general jurisdiction; or

(d) By the written admission of the party.

(e) If served by posting pursuant to Section 415.45, by the affidavit of the person who posted the premises, showing the time and place of posting, and an affidavit showing the time and place copies of the summons and of the complaint were mailed to the party to be served, if in fact mailed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 719.)
-------------------------------------------

417.30.

After a summons has been served on a person, proof of service of the summons as provided in Section 417.10 or 417.20 shall be filed, unless the defendant has previously made a general appearance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

417.40.

(a) Any proof of service which is signed by a person registered under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 22350) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code or the person’s employee or independent contractor shall indicate the county in which the person is registered and the number assigned to the person pursuant to Section 22355 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 10.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 11 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

417.40.

(a) A proof of service that is signed by a person who is required to be registered under Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 22350) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code or the person’s employee or independent contractor shall indicate the number assigned to the person by the county clerk pursuant to Section 22355 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 563, Sec. 11.   (AB 747)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Objection to Jurisdiction [418.10. - 418.11.]

418.10.

(a) A defendant, on or before the last day of his or her time to plead or within any further time that the court may for good cause allow, may serve and file a notice of motion for one or more of the following purposes:

(1) To quash service of summons on the ground of lack of jurisdiction of the court over him or her.

(2) To stay or dismiss the action on the ground of inconvenient forum.

(3) To dismiss the action pursuant to the applicable provisions of Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 583.110) of Title 8.

(b) The notice shall designate, as the time for making the motion, a date not more than 30 days after filing of the notice. The notice shall be served in the same manner, and at the same times, prescribed by subdivision (b) of Section 1005. The service and filing of the notice shall extend the defendant’s time to plead until 15 days after service upon him or her of a written notice of entry of an order denying his or her motion, except that for good cause shown the court may extend the defendant’s time to plead for an additional period not exceeding 20 days.

(c) If the motion is denied by the trial court, the defendant, within 10 days after service upon him or her of a written notice of entry of
 an order of the court denying his or her motion, or within any further time not exceeding 20 days that the trial court may for good cause allow, and before pleading, may petition an appropriate reviewing court for a writ of mandate to require the trial court to enter its order quashing the service of summons or staying or dismissing the action. The defendant shall file or enter his or her responsive pleading in the trial court within the time prescribed by subdivision (b) unless, on or before the last day of the defendant’s time to plead, he or she serves upon the adverse party and files with the trial court a notice that he or she has petitioned for a writ of mandate. The service and filing of the notice shall extend the defendant’s time to plead until 10 days after service upon him or her of a written notice of the final judgment in the mandate proceeding. The time to plead may for good cause shown be extended by the trial court for an additional period not exceeding 20 days.

(d) No default may be entered against the defendant before expiration of his or her time to plead, and no motion under this section, or under Section 473 or 473.5 when joined with a motion under this section, or application to the court or stipulation of the parties for an extension of the time to plead, shall be deemed a general appearance by the defendant.

(e) A defendant or cross-defendant may make a motion under this section and simultaneously answer, demur, or move to strike the complaint or cross-complaint.

(1) Notwithstanding Section 1014, no act by a party who makes a motion under this section, including filing an answer, demurrer, or motion to strike constitutes an appearance, unless the court denies the motion made under this section. If the court denies the motion made under this section, the defendant or
 cross-defendant is not deemed to have generally appeared until entry of the order denying the motion.

(2) If the motion made under this section is denied and the defendant or cross-defendant petitions for a writ of mandate pursuant to subdivision (c), the defendant or cross-defendant is not deemed to have generally appeared until the proceedings on the writ petition have finally concluded.

(3) Failure to make a motion under this section at the time of filing a demurrer or motion to strike constitutes a waiver of the issues of lack of personal jurisdiction, inadequacy of process, inadequacy of service of process, inconvenient forum, and delay in prosecution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 69, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

418.11.

An appearance at a hearing at which ex parte relief is sought, or an appearance at a hearing for which an ex parte application for a provisional remedy is made, is not a general appearance and does not constitute a waiver of the right to make a motion under Section 418.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 62, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 6. OF THE PLEADINGS IN CIVIL ACTIONS [420. - 475.]



  CHAPTER 1. The Pleadings in General [420. - 422.40.]

420.

The pleadings are the formal allegations by the parties of their respective claims and defenses, for the judgment of the Court.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

421.

The forms of pleading in civil actions, and the rules by which the sufficiency of the pleadings is to be determined, are those prescribed in this Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

422.10.

The pleadings allowed in civil actions are complaints, demurrers, answers, and cross-complaints.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

422.30.

(a) Every pleading shall contain a caption setting forth:

(1) The name of the court and county in which the action is brought.

(2) The title of the action.

(b) In a limited civil case, the caption shall state that the case is a limited civil case, and the clerk shall classify the case accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

422.40.

In the complaint, the title of the action shall include the names of all the parties; but, except as otherwise provided by statute or rule of the Judicial Council, in other pleadings it is sufficient to state the name of the first party on each side with an appropriate indication of other parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Pleadings Demanding Relief [425.10. - 429.30.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [425.10. - 425.55.]

425.10.

(a) A complaint or cross-complaint shall contain both of the following:
